District of Columbia statutes.
48-105

Complaints to be investigated.

It shall be the duty of the Mayor to investigate a complaint for a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter on the information of any person who lays before him satisfactory evidence by which to substantiate such complaints.

History

Feb. 17, 1898, 30 Stat. 247, ch. 25, § 5
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 2(d), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-105.
1973 Ed., § 33-105.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-116 substituted “Mayor” for “Director of Public Health”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: Section 1 of the Act of August 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, provided that the Health Officer of the District of Columbia would be known as the Director of Public Health. The Health Department of the District of Columbia, including the office of the head thereof, was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 57 of the Board of Commissioners, dated June 30, 1953, and Reorganization Order No. 52, dated June 30, 1953, combined and redesignated Organization Order No. 141, dated February 11, 1964, established, under the direction and control of a Commissioner, a Department of Public Health headed by a Director, for the purpose of planning, implementing, and directing public health and hospital care programs, and for performing certain other allied medical and paramedical functions. The Anatomical Board was established under the direction and control of the Director of Public Health consisting of members as prescribed in the D.C. Code. The Order prior to redesignation abolished the previously existing Health Department, Gallinger Hospital, Glenn Dale Sanatorium, and the Anatomical Board, and transferred their functions and positions to the new Department. The organization of the new Department was set out in the Order. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions stated in Organization Order No. 141 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Human Resources by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969, as amended by Commissioner’s Order No. 70-83, dated March 6, 1970. Functions stated in Organization Order No. 141 were transferred to the Department of Environmental Services by Commissioner’s Order 71-255, dated July 27, 1971, as amended by Commissioner’s Order 72-96, dated April 18, 1972. Functions stated in Commissioner’s Order 71-255 were transferred to the Director of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by § III B. (9) of Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983.